Utah statutes.
4-37-106.   Cooperative agreements.

In fulfilling their respective responsibilities under this chapter, the department, Division of Wildlife Resources, and Wildlife Board may make memorandums of understanding or enter into other agreements for mutual cooperation.



Enacted by Chapter 153, 1994 General Session

